Utah statutes.
58-37-8.5.   Applicability of Title 76 prosecutions under this chapter.

Unless specifically excluded in or inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of Title 76, Chapters 1, 2, 3, and 4, are fully applicable to prosecutions under this chapter.

